District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.02

Extent of coverage.

The occupational safety and health management program shall encompass all aspects of the total work environment throughout the District government, and shall include, but not be limited to:

(1)

Employee safety and health, inclusive of physical welfare at the work site and environmental control of occupational diseases;

(2)

Fire safety;

(3)

Motor vehicle safety;

(4)

Safety of nonemployee users of city facilities and services;

(5)

Contractor safety; and

(6)

Protection of District government property.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2002, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-621.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.2.